Utah statutes.
53A-15-1002.5.   Electronic High School created -- Purpose.

The Electronic High School is created:

(1)  to provide an opportunity for a student who has failed a course to retake the course and earn course credit;

(2)  to allow a student to complete high school graduation requirements and exit high school early;

(3)  to allow a student to take a course online so that the student has greater flexibility in scheduling courses during the regular school day; and

(4)  to allow a home-schooled or private school student in Utah to take a course within the Utah high school core curriculum.

